Florida, session 2026, SB220.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 110.221, Florida Statutes, is amended to 16 read: 17 110.221âParental or family medical leave.â 18 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 19 (a)ââFamilyâ means a child, parent, or spouse., and the 20 term 21 (b)ââFamily medical leaveâ means leave requested by an 22 employee for a serious family illness including an accident, 23 disease, or condition that poses imminent danger of death, 24 requires hospitalization involving an organ transplant, limb 25 amputation, or other procedure of similar severity, or any 26 mental or physical condition that requires constant in-home 27 care. 28 (c)ââPaid parental leaveâ means fully paid leave for the 29 father or mother of a child who is born to or adopted by that 30 parent. 31 (d)âThe term âParental leaveâ means leave for the father or 32 mother of a child who is born to or adopted by that parent. 33 (2)âThe state shall provide 12 weeks of paid parental leave 34 to any employee in the career service following the birth or 35 adoption of a child by the employee. The state may not require 36 such employee to use his or her annual leave or sick leave 37 during the initial 12-week period. The employee is entitled to 38 accumulate all benefits granted under paid leave status. 39 (3)âThe state may shall not: 40 (a)âTerminate the employment of any employee in the career 41 service because of the pregnancy of the employee or the 42 employeeâs spouse or the adoption of a child by that employee. 43 (b)âRefuse to grant to a career service employee: 44 1.âPaid parental leave; or 45 2.âParental or family medical leave without pay for a 46 period not to exceed 6 months. Such leave shall commence on a 47 date that is determined by the employee in consultation with the 48 attending physician following notification to the employer in 49 writing, and that is approved by the employer. 50 (c)âDeny a career service employee the use of and payment 51 for annual leave credits for parental or family medical leave. 52 Such leave shall commence on a date determined by the employee 53 in consultation with the attending physician following 54 notification to the employer in writing. 55 (d)âDeny a career service employee the use of and payment 56 for accrued sick leave or family sick leave for any reason 57 deemed necessary by a physician or as established by policy. 58 (e)âRequire that a career service employee take a mandatory 59 parental or family medical leave. 60 (4)(3)âUpon returning at the end of parental or family 61 medical leave of absence, such employee shall be reinstated to 62 the same job or to an equivalent position with equivalent pay 63 and with seniority, retirement, fringe benefits, and other 64 service credits accumulated prior to the leave period. If any 65 portion of the parental or family medical leave is paid leave, 66 the employee shall be entitled to accumulate all benefits 67 granted under paid leave status. 68 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.